Utah statutes.
63K-3-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Disaster" means a situation causing, or threatening to cause, widespread
damage, social disruption, or injury or loss of life or property resulting
from attack, internal disturbance, natural phenomena or technological hazard.
(2)  "Attack" means a nuclear, conventional, biological, or chemical warfare
action against the United States of America or this state.
(3)  "Internal disturbance" means a riot, prison break, disruptive terrorism
or strike.
(4)  "Natural phenomena" means any earthquake, tornado, storm, flood,
landslide, avalanche, forest or range fire, drought, or epidemic.
(5)  "Technological hazard" means any hazardous materials accident, mine
accident, train derailment, air crash, radiation incident, pollution,
structural fire or explosion.
